Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB290.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State-related University Nonpreferred Appropriation Act of 2025.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Auditor General." The Auditor General of the Commonwealth."Current fiscal year." The fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718192021 "Prior fiscal year." The fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."State-related university." The term includes:(1) The Pennsylvania State University.(2) The University of Pittsburgh.(3) Temple University.(4) Lincoln University.Section 3. Cost basis during current fiscal year.Payments made to a State-related university on account of an appropriation under this act shall be made on the basis of costs during the current fiscal year.Section 4. Frequency and basis of payments.(a) Monthly payments.--(1) Payments made under section 10 to a State-related university from an appropriation provided in this act shall be made monthly during the current fiscal year.(2) (Reserved).(b) Estimated costs.--(1) The monthly payments shall be made to a State-related university under section 3 on the basis of estimated costs. The estimate of costs shall be submitted by the State-related university to the secretary, the General Assembly and the State Treasurer not later than 30 days prior to the date on which the payment is to be made.(2) (Reserved).Section 5. Purposes of expenditures and statement of expenditures and costs.(a) Duties of State-related universities.--(1) A State-related university shall apply the money 20250SB0290PN0267 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated by this act only for such purposes as are permitted in this act and shall at all times maintain proper records showing the application of the money.(2) Not later than 120 days after the close of the current fiscal year, the State-related university shall file, with the secretary, the General Assembly and the Auditor General, a statement that specifies the amounts and purposes of all expenditures made from money appropriated by this act and other university accounts during the current fiscal year, as provided in section 3, used as a basis for receipt of an appropriation during the current fiscal year.(b) Duties of Auditor General.--The statement of expenditures and costs shall be reviewed by the Auditor General. The Auditor General may, with respect to the money appropriated by this act, audit and disallow expenditures made for purposes not permitted by this act, recover the sums from the State-related university and transmit the recovered sums to the State Treasurer. In respect to expenditures made by the State-related university from money other than that appropriated by this act, the Auditor General may review only, and shall file annually with the General Assembly, information concerning those expenditures as the General Assembly or any of its committees may require.Section 6. Duty to provide information.A State-related university shall provide full, complete and accurate information as may be required by the department or the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.20250SB0290PN0267 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Financial statements.A State-related university shall present and report its financial statements required under this act in accordance with:(1) The generally accepted accounting principles as prescribed by the National Association of College and University Business Officers, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, or their successors, or by any other recognized authoritative body.(2) The "Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Budget Instructions for the State System of Higher Education, State-Related Universities and Non-State-Related Colleges and Universities."(3) The financial reporting policies and standards promulgated by the Federal Government and by the Commonwealth that apply to the State-related university.Section 8. Agricultural College Land Scrip Fund.The money of the restricted account within the Agricultural College Land Scrip Fund is hereby appropriated for the current fiscal year, in accordance with the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, establishing the restricted account.Section 9. Restrictions, limitations and conditions on use of appropriations.The following restrictions and limitations apply:(1) Money appropriated by this act to the University of Pittsburgh may not be used for costs of personnel and operations of an environmental law clinic.(2) Money appropriated by this act to the University of Pittsburgh shall only be used for costs directly related to the provision of instruction for graduate and undergraduate 20250SB0290PN0267 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 students and costs incurred in providing student-related services and community outreach services consistent with the existing laws of this Commonwealth.Section 10. Appropriations.(a) Current fiscal year.--The following sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated to the boards of trustees of the respective State-related universities for the current fiscal year, for the purposes and in the amounts as follows:(1) To The Pennsylvania State University, for general support.State appropriation..........................242,096,000(2) To The Pennsylvania State University, for the Pennsylvania College of Technology.State appropriation...........................35,670,000(3) To the University of Pittsburgh, for general support.State appropriation..........................151,507,000(4) To the University of Pittsburgh, for rural education outreach.State appropriation............................3,791,000(5) To Temple University, for general support.State appropriation..........................158,206,000(6) To Lincoln University, for general support.State appropriation...........................21,890,000(b) (Reserved).Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0290PN0267 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728